Washington statutes.
RCW 32.35.055

Amending articles—Filing with director—Contents.

A stock savings bank amending its articles of incorporation shall deliver articles of amendment to the director for filing as required for articles of incorporation. The articles of amendment shall set forth:

(1) The name of the stock savings bank;

(2) The text of each amendment adopted;

(3) The date of each amendment's adoption;

(4) If the amendment was adopted by the incorporators or board of directors without shareholder action, a statement to that effect and that shareholder action was not required; and

(5) If shareholder action was required, a statement that the amendment was duly approved by the shareholders in accordance with the provisions of RCW 32.32.490.

[ 1999 c 14 s 6.]